Louisiana, session 2026, HB459.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1463(A), (F), and (G), 1483(7)(a)(iii), (b)(ii), and (c)(ii), (8),
(11)(a) and (d)(ii), and 1501.1(A)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:1463(H)
and (I) and 1483(33) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1463. Political material; ethics; prohibitions
A. The Legislature of Louisiana finds that the state has a compelling interest
in taking every necessary step to assure that all elections are held in a fair and ethical
manner and finds that an election cannot be held in a fair and ethical manner when
any candidate or other person is allowed to print or distribute any material which
falsely alleges that a candidate is supported by or affiliated with another candidate,
group of candidates, or other person, or a political faction, or to publish statements
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
that make scurrilous, false, or irresponsible adverse comments about a candidate or
a proposition. The legislature further finds that the state has a compelling interest
to protect the electoral process and that the people have an interest in knowing the
identity of each candidate whose number appears on a sample ballot in order to be
fully informed and to exercise their right to vote for a candidate of their choice. The
legislature further finds that it is essential to the protection of the electoral process
that the people be able to know who is responsible for publications in order to more
properly evaluate the statements contained in them and to informatively exercise
their right to vote. The legislature further finds that it is essential to the protection
of the electoral process to prohibit misrepresentation that a person, committee, or
organization speaks, writes, or acts on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or
political party, or an agent or employee thereof. The legislature further finds that it
is essential to the protection of the electoral process that the public not be deceived
or misled by an image, likeness, or voice of a candidate or elected official subject to
recall that is created using artificial intelligence.
* * *
F.(1) No person shall make or cause to be made any electioneering
communication that portrays a candidate or an elected official subject to recall and
that is, through the use of artificial intelligence, created, altered, or digitally
manipulated in a manner that would falsely appear to a reasonable observer to be an
authentic record of the actual speech or conduct of a candidate or an elected official
subject to recall and that would falsely appear to replace an individual's likeness with
the likeness of a candidate or an elected official subject to recall without providing
a clear and understandable disclosure on the electioneering communication that it
was created using artificial intelligence. The form of the disclosure shall be
consistent with the disclosure requirements of Subsection (E) of this Section.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Artificial intelligence" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.
14:73.14.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
(b) "Candidate" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S. 18:1483.
G.F. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings: term "digital
(1) "Digital material" means any material or communication that, for a fee
or other payment, is placed or promoted on a public facing website, web application,
or digital application, including a social network, advertising network, or search
engine.
(2) "Electioneering communication" shall have the same meaning as
provided in R.S. 18:1483."
H. G. Whoever violates any provision of this Section with the intent to injure
the reputation of a candidate or elected official subject to recall or to otherwise
deceive a voter shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars or be imprisoned,
with or without hard labor, for not more than two years, or both.
I. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a media entity that
broadcasts a paid political announcement, advertisement, or electioneering
communication in which the broadcaster has had no input in or control over the
announcement, advertisement, or electioneering communication. As used in this
Subsection, the term "media entity" includes the same entities as provided in
R.S.18:1483(33).
* * *
§1483. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings given
to each in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(7)(a) "Contribution", except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, means
a gift, conveyance, payment, or deposit of money or anything of value, or the
forgiveness of a loan or of a debt made to any of the following:
* * *
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
(iii) Any person for the purpose of funding an expenditure to influence the
nomination or election of a person to public office, whether made before or after the
an election.
* * *
(b) "Contribution" shall also include, without limitation:
* * *
(ii) Coordinated expenditures, which made for the purpose of supporting,
opposing, or otherwise influencing the nomination or election of the candidate and
shall be considered to be a contribution to such the candidate, the principal campaign
committee, or the subsidiary committee thereof that, directly or through an agent,
cooperated with, consulted with, or acted in concert with the creator or disseminator
of or requested or suggested the creation or dissemination of the electioneering
communication.
* * *
(c) "Contribution" shall not include:
* * *
(ii) Any dues or membership fees of any membership organization or
corporation made by its members or stockholders, if such membership organization
or corporation is not organized primarily for the purpose of supporting, opposing or
otherwise influencing the nomination for election, or election, of any person to
public office making expenditures for electioneering communications. However, any
funds of such an organization or corporation used for the purpose of contributions
to candidates or committees or to publicly advocate support or defeat of a candidate
or for expenditures as defined in this Chapter expenditures for electioneering
communications shall be reportable and all contributions made by such membership
organization or corporation which are otherwise reportable under the provisions of
this Chapter shall be reported.
* * *
(8) "Coordinated expenditure" means an expenditure made by any person in
cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
candidate, his principal campaign committee or a subsidiary committee thereof, or
their agents for the purpose of supporting, opposing, or otherwise influencing the
nomination or election of the candidate of expenditures for electioneering
communications.
* * *
(11)(a) "Expenditure" means a purchase, payment, advance, deposit, or gift,
of money or anything of value made for a purpose provided for in R.S. 18:1501.1(A)
or 1505.2(I) by a candidate or committee. For a person other than a candidate or
committee, "expenditure" means a purchase, payment, advance, deposit, or gift, of
money or anything of value made for an electioneering communication.
* * *
(d) "Expenditure" shall not include:
* * *
(ii) Any communication, including an electioneering communication, by any
membership organization or business entity to its employees, members, directors, or
stockholders, or their family members, if such membership organization or business
entity is not organized primarily for the purpose of supporting, opposing, or
otherwise influencing the nomination for election, or election, of any person to
public office or for the purpose of supporting or opposing a proposition or question
to be submitted to the voters making electioneering communications. All other
expenditures made by such membership organization or business entity which are
otherwise reportable under the provisions of this Chapter shall be reported. For
purposes of this definition, business entity means any proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal entity, including their subsidiaries.
* * *
(33)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any communication, whether
printed, digital, or broadcast by a media entity, that meets either of the following:
(i) Contains express advocacy supporting or opposing the nomination or
election of a person to public office, the recall of a public official, or a proposition
or question submitted to the voters.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
(ii) The only reasonable conclusion to be drawn from the presentation,
content, and context of the communication is that it is intended to appeal for a vote
in a specific election for or against a specific candidate or for or against the recall of
a specific elected official or a proposition or for or against a question submitted to
the voters. Consideration of the context of a communication shall include the
temporal proximity to the specific election, whether the communication is primarily
directed to voters in the specific election, and whether the communication is part of
a larger campaign of communication regarding an issue other than the specific
election.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "media entity" includes a radio broadcast
station, television broadcast station, cable or satellite television company, or other
video service provider, streaming video provider, newspaper company, periodical
company, billboard company, advertisement agency, or media platform responsible
for the production or publication of any advertisement, voice, data, or other
communications, information services, or internet access provider, or bona fide news
or public interest website operator.
* * *
§1501.1. Reports by persons not candidates or committees
A.(1) Any person, other than a candidate or a committee, who makes any
expenditure for express advocacy supporting or opposing the nomination or election
of a person to public office, the recall of a public official, or a proposition or
question submitted to the voters, or for a communication for which the only
reasonable conclusion to be drawn from the presentation and content is that it is
intended to appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or for or against the
recall of a specific elected official or a proposition or question submitted to the
voters an electioneering communication shall file reports if such expenditures exceed
one thousand dollars in the aggregate during the aggregating period as defined for
committees.
* * *
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 459 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 18:1463(C)(5), 1491.7(B)(22), and 1495.5(B)(21) are hereby
repealed.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber definitions contained in R.S. 18:1483 and
to correct any cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent
with the provisions of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.